Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
Article 2 Pilots Generally

Cross references.

Duty of pilots to report unlawful discharge of stone, gravel, or ballast into bays and harbors, §

52-8-2

.

52-6-30.
Qualifications for pilot’s license.

The commissioners at each of the ports of this state are entitled to license during good behavior such citizens of the United States who are of good character as they shall think fit to act as pilots in piloting vessels underway in the waters of the several ports and rivers for which they shall be licensed. Any pilot who is licensed as of January 1, 1995, shall continue to act under such license until said license is revoked or the pilot is suspended or is retired as provided in this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1886, p. 38, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 1653; Ga. L. 1896, p. 85, § 1; Ga. L. 1901, p. 30, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 1899; Ga. L. 1921, p. 103, § 1; Code 1933, § 80-104; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 4; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1355, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 846, § 2.

52-6-31.
Number of pilots.

The number of licensed pilots shall not exceed 21 for the port of Savannah, three for the port of Doboy and Darien, eight for the port of Brunswick, two for the Great Satilla River, and two for the port of St. Marys.

History.

Ga. L. 1886, p. 38, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 1653; Ga. L. 1896, p. 85, § 1; Ga. L. 1901, p. 30, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 1899; Ga. L. 1921, p. 103, § 1; Code 1933, § 80-104; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 4; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1355, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 846, § 3; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 52; Ga. L. 2007, p. 105, § 1/HB 132.

52-6-32.
Restrictions as to persons who may receive fees, gratuities, or rewards for conducting or piloting vessels.

No person other than a duly licensed pilot shall be entitled to receive any fee, gratuity, or reward for piloting any vessels underway in the waters of any of the ports, rivers, or harbors for which pilots may be licensed under the terms of this chapter. Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as prohibiting payments being made to docking pilots for services rendered in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 52-6-45.

History.

Ga. L. 1886, p. 38, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 1653; Ga. L. 1896, p. 85, § 1; Ga. L. 1901, p. 30, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 1899; Ga. L. 1921, p. 103, § 1; Code 1933, § 80-306; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 4; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1355, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 846, § 4.

52-6-33.
Form of license; oath of pilot.

The license to a pilot must be in the form of a certificate of appointment, which must be signed by a majority of the commissioners or by their chairperson by their direction; and each pilot, on receiving a license, shall take and subscribe an oath in the following form:

“I, A.B., appointed pilot for the port and harbor of , do swear that I will faithfully, according to the best of my ability, perform the duties of a pilot in and for the port and harbor of , and will at all times — wind, weather, and health permitting — use my best efforts to go on board every vessel I shall see and conceive to be bound for, coming into, going out of, or underway within said port or harbor, unless I am well assured there is some other licensed pilot on board the same; that I will, at all times, make the best dispatch in my power to convey any vessel committed to my charge coming into, going out of, or underway within said port or harbor; and will at all times well and truly observe, fulfill, and follow, to the best of my skill and judgment, all such orders and directions as I may receive from the commissioners in all matters and things relating to the duty of a pilot.”

Click to view

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 34; Code 1863, § 1455; Code 1868, § 1512; Code 1873, § 1506; Code 1882, § 1506; Civil Code 1895, § 1661; Civil Code 1910, § 1907; Code 1933, § 80-107; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 846, § 5.

52-6-34.
Pilots’ bonds — Generally.

Every pilot licensed as provided for in this chapter shall, before receiving his license, make and deliver to the commissioners a bond, payable to the chairman of the board and his successors in office, in the penal sum of $2,000.00, with security to be approved by the commissioners and with the condition faithfully to perform his duties as pilot. The bond shall be renewable at the discretion of the commissioners with such security or additional security as they may require.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 34; Code 1863, § 1456; Code 1868, § 1513; Code 1873, § 1507; Code 1882, § 1507; Civil Code 1895, § 1662; Civil Code 1910, § 1908; Ga. L. 1921, p. 105, § 1; Code 1933, § 80-108; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 6.

52-6-35.
Pilots’ bonds — Continuation of existing bonds; venue of actions on bonds; parties to actions.

All bonds given pursuant to prior law and in effect on March 8, 1945, are continued in full force and effect. Actions on bonds provided for in Code Section 52-6-34 may be brought in any court having jurisdiction thereof, without any order for that purpose, by any person or vessel endangered or endamaged by the misconduct, carelessness, or neglect of the pilot.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 34; Code 1863, § 1456; Code 1868, § 1513; Code 1873, § 1507; Code 1882, § 1507; Civil Code 1895, § 1662; Civil Code 1910, § 1908; Ga. L. 1921, p. 105, § 1; Code 1933, § 80-108; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 6.

52-6-36.
Revocation of license for conducting or piloting vessel arrested under court process.

Any pilot who shall, with knowledge of the arrest of any vessel under process from any court of record, conduct or pilot the vessel out of the port or harbor where the arrest is made while the vessel is in charge of any officer of any court of record shall forfeit his license and be forever disqualified from acting as pilot.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1459; Code 1868, § 1516; Code 1873, § 1510; Code 1882, § 1510; Civil Code 1895, § 1663; Civil Code 1910, § 1909; Code 1933, § 80-109; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 12.

Cross references.

Hearings regarding revocation or suspension of license for cause, §

52-6-38

.

52-6-37.
Authority of commissioners to suspend pilots, to revoke licenses, and to assess fines and penalties; grounds for suspension, revocation, fines, or other penalties.

The commissioners may suspend any pilot or deprive him of his license or assess against him such fines and other penalties as they may think best, upon evidence satisfactory to them of negligence, unskillfulness, inattention to duty, intemperance, addiction to the use of drugs, mental derangement, misconduct, or willful violation of any of their rules or regulations, subject to the right of the pilot to appeal as provided in Code Section 52-6-38.

History.

Ga. L. 1886, p. 38, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 1654; Civil Code 1910, § 1900; Code 1933, § 80-110; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 7.

52-6-38.
Hearings before commissioners; enforcement of decrees and orders by execution or warrant of distress.

All matters concerning the assessment of fines or penalties against pilots or other persons, the suspension or revocation of pilot licenses, and any other matter relating to the use, business, or care of a pilot in any of the harbors shall be heard and determined by the commissioners, or a majority of them, appointed for the care of the pilotage where the violation, damage, or dispute may arise, upon reasonable notice to the pilot, pilots, or other persons concerned and an opportunity for the pilot, pilots, or other persons to be heard. The commissioners are authorized by their decree or order to decide and regulate every such matter, to assess fines and penalties, and to suspend or revoke licenses. They shall have the power to enforce the decree or order by execution or warrant of distress, under their hands and seals or under the hands and seals of any three of them, directed to any sheriff or constable of the county where the execution issues and commanding the sale of the offender’s goods, or so much of them as may be necessary to satisfy the execution or warrant. All sales thereunder shall be made in conformity with the laws of the state in relating to sheriffs’ sales. The sheriff and constable shall be liable to be ruled before the judge of the superior court as in other cases for default in duly executing such process.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 34; Code 1863, § 1472; Code 1868, § 1529; Code 1873, § 1523; Code 1882, § 1523; Civil Code 1895, § 1671; Civil Code 1910, § 1917; Code 1933, § 80-314; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 15; Ga. L. 1995, p. 846, § 6.

52-6-39.
Issuance of subpoenas.

When the attendance of any person shall be required as a witness before the commissioners in any matter or claim of which they shall have jurisdiction, it shall be the duty of their secretary, upon application, to issue subpoenas signed by him and directed to the persons whose attendance shall be required when such persons reside or shall be found in the county where such matters or claims may be pending. The summons shall express the cause and the party at whose action it is issued and shall be served as subpoenas of courts of record of this state are served at least 24 hours before the meeting of the commissioners to which it shall be returnable; but the subpoenas may be served by a messenger of the commissioners or by any sheriff or constable and the return of the messenger, sheriff, or constable shall be evidence of the service thereof.

History.

Laws 1832, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 45; Code 1863, § 1476; Code 1868, § 1533; Code 1873, § 1527; Code 1882, § 1527; Civil Code 1895, § 1675; Civil Code 1910, § 1921; Code 1933, § 80-201; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 16.

52-6-40.
Failure of witness to answer subpoena.

Any witness summoned pursuant to Code Section 52-6-39, whose testimony shall appear to be material and who shall fail to appear, may be attached by the commissioners. The attachment may be directed to a sheriff or constable and made returnable to the next superior court of the county; and the court may fine the witnesses in a sum not exceeding $100.00, unless a good excuse is made to the judge of the court. The witness shall also be liable to action at the action of the party injured by the nonattendance.

History.

Laws 1832, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 45; Code 1863, § 1477; Code 1868, § 1534; Code 1873, § 1528; Code 1882, § 1528; Civil Code 1895, § 1676; Civil Code 1910, § 1922; Code 1933, § 80-202; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 17.

52-6-41.
Taking of interrogatories and depositions from nonresidents and seamen.

When the person whose attendance is required as a witness is a nonresident of the county where the matter or claim is pending or is a seaman, his interrogatories or depositions may be taken and returned to the commissioners in the manner provided by law for taking and returning interrogatories and depositions in the courts of record of this state and may be put in evidence before the commissioners when the personal attendance of the witness cannot be secured. Reasonable notice of intention to take the interrogatories or depositions and of the time and place of the hearing must be given to all persons interested, or to their attorneys, or to the master, agent, or charterer of any vessel, where the vessel or her owners or cargo are interested.

History.

Laws 1832, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 45, 46; Code 1863, §§ 1478, 1479; Code 1868, §§ 1535, 1536; Code 1873, §§ 1529, 1530; Code 1882, §§ 1529, 1530; Civil Code 1895, §§ 1677, 1678; Civil Code 1910, §§ 1923, 1924; Code 1933, §§ 80-203, 80-204; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 18; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 52.

Cross references.

Depositions, interrogatories, §

9-11-26

et seq.

52-6-42.
Appeal to superior court — Generally.

In any case where a pilot is suspended or the pilot’s license is revoked or where a fine exceeding $150.00 is imposed by the commissioners on a pilot or any other person, the pilot or other person concerned may petition the judge of the superior court of the county where the judgment or sentence of the commissioners was made, setting forth on oath the circumstances of the case. A copy of the petition shall be served upon the chairperson or secretary of the commissioners at least three days before the petition is presented and the commissioners shall be entitled to be heard as to whether there is sufficient ground for the allowance of an appeal. If the judge of the superior court should think there is sufficient ground for the allowance of an appeal, such judge shall issue an order directing an issue to be made between the appellant and the commissioners, which issue shall be tried by a jury at the next term of the superior court, unless good cause is shown for a continuance. If, at the trial, a verdict should be rendered in favor of the appellant, the judge of the superior court shall order that the fine be remitted, that the suspension be canceled, or that the license be restored. Either the appellant or the commissioners may move the court for a new trial and may appeal to the Court of Appeals from the court’s order entered upon the motion, as is provided by law in cases of appeal from orders granting or refusing a new trial in common-law cases.

History.

Laws 1830, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 43; Code 1863, § 1481; Code 1868, § 1538; Code 1873, § 1532; Code 1882, § 1532; Civil Code 1895, § 1680; Civil Code 1910, § 1926; Code 1933, § 80-206; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 20; Ga. L. 1995, p. 846, § 7.

Cross references.

Appeals to superior court generally, T. 5, C. 3.

52-6-43.
Appeal to superior court — Use of interrogatories and depositions.

In cases of appeal, testimony for use in the superior court may be taken and returned by interrogatories or depositions, under the circumstances and in the manner provided by law for the taking and returning of testimony in cases pending in the superior courts of this state.

History.

Laws 1830, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 43; Code 1863, § 1482; Code 1868, § 1539; Code 1873, § 1533; Code 1882, § 1533; Civil Code 1895, § 1681; Civil Code 1910, § 1927; Code 1933, § 80-207; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 21.

Cross references.

Depositions, interrogatories, §

9-11-26

et seq.

52-6-44.
Fees relating to hearings before commissioners.

The secretary’s fees for each subpoena shall be 25¢ and for each attachment 50¢. For serving any subpoena and for executing and returning an attachment, a sheriff’s or constable’s fee shall be charged as otherwise provided by law. The commissioner or notary public before whom testimony is taken by deposition shall receive for his services and for reporting and transcribing the question or answers of the witness, or both, the fees allowed by law for similar services rendered in cases pending in courts of record of this state.

History.

Laws 1832, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 46; Code 1863, § 1480; Code 1868, § 1537; Code 1873, § 1531; Code 1882, § 1531; Civil Code 1895, § 1679; Civil Code 1910, § 1925; Code 1933, § 80-205; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 19.

Cross references.

Fees of justices of the peace, §

15-10-80

et seq.

Obligation of fee system for sheriffs, §

15-16-19

.

Fees of notaries public, § 45-17-11.

52-6-45.
Vessels to be under direction and control of licensed pilots; exemptions; use of docking pilots.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, every vessel shall be under the direction and control of a pilot licensed by this state when underway in the bays, rivers, harbors, and ports of this state and the approaches thereto.

The requirement of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to the following vessels:

Vessels exempted by the laws of the United States;

Vessels under 200 gross tons; and

Vessels in distress or jeopardy, except that any such vessel shall take a state licensed pilot as soon as one arrives at the vessel.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit a vessel from utilizing the services of a docking pilot in addition to the state licensed pilot required under this chapter during docking and undocking maneuvers with the assistance of one or more tugboats. The commissioners are authorized, consistent with all other requirements of this chapter, to establish by regulation or otherwise the duties, responsibilities, and fees of state licensed pilots when operating with a docking pilot aboard a vessel.

History.

Ga. L. 1886, p. 38, §§ 5, 6, 8; Civil Code 1895, §§ 1657, 1658, 1660; Civil Code 1910, §§ 1903, 1904, 1906; Code 1933, §§ 80-303, 80-304, 80-310; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 9; Ga. L. 1986, p. 482, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 846, § 8.

52-6-46.
Pilotage fees — Fees for coastwise vessels.

Reserved.
Repealed by Ga. L. 1995, p. 846, § 9, effective April 19, 1995.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 9.

52-6-47.
Pilotage fees — Time of payment; security for payment.

A pilot bringing a vessel into port or a pilot who has tendered his or her services outside the bar to a vessel which is required under this chapter to accept the services of a pilot shall be entitled to the payment of fees for inward, outward, and all other movements of the vessel within the waters of the port, subject to the commissioners’ regulations, before the vessel leaves the port and may require the vessel to give adequate security therefor, to be approved by the commissioners, before the vessel leaves the port. If the payment is not made or the security is not given, no pilot shall be required to take the vessel out. The master, owner, or agent of any vessel which is in readiness to leave must, if possible, give notice of that fact to the commissioners at the port in question or to its authorized representative. The acceptance of security for pilotage fees shall in no way affect the lien specified in Code Section 52-6-49, given in case the fees are not paid.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1464; Code 1868, § 1521; Code 1873, § 1515; Code 1882, § 1515; Ga. L. 1886, p. 38, § 7; Civil Code 1895, §§ 1659, 1666; Civil Code 1910, §§ 1905, 1912; Code 1933, §§ 80-305, 80-308; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 12; Ga. L. 1995, p. 846, § 10.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, “commissioners’ ” was substituted for “Commissioners’ ” in the first sentence.

52-6-48.
Pilotage fees — Requests or demands by pilots of fees different than those fixed by commissioners.

If any pilot shall ask or demand for his services greater or different fees than those specified in the rates of pilotage fixed by the commissioners, the commissioners shall, on due proof thereof, require him to pay the commissioners double the amount of the fees fixed by the commissioners.

History.

Ga. L. 1886, p. 38, § 7; Civil Code 1895, § 1659; Civil Code 1910, § 1905; Code 1933, § 80-305; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 12.

52-6-49.
Liabilities and penalties for failure to take pilot or pay pilotage fees.

Any vessel that fails to take a pilot required under this chapter or that is operated in violation of any other requirement of this chapter or the regulations adopted by the commissioners under the authority of this chapter may be assessed a civil penalty by the commissioners in an amount not to exceed $25,000.00 per violation. Any vessel assessed such a penalty shall be liable in rem for the payment of the penalty amount.

The owner, charterer, managing operator, master, or individual in charge of a vessel that fails to take a pilot required under this chapter or who violates any other requirement of this chapter or the regulations adopted by the commissioners under the authority of this chapter may be assessed a civil penalty by the commissioners in an amount not to exceed $25,000.00 per violation.

Any owner, charterer, managing operator, master, or individual in charge of a vessel who knowingly and willfully refuses to take a pilot required under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any vessel and the owner, charterer, managing operator, master, or individual in charge of the vessel that fails to take a pilot required under this chapter or that fails to pay the applicable pilotage fee when a pilot has been taken shall be liable to the first pilot who offered pilotage services, in the case of a vessel failing to take a required pilot, or to the pilot who performed the pilotage services, in the case of a vessel taking the pilot but failing to pay the pilotage fee, for the full amount of the applicable pilotage fee. The pilot is given a lien on the vessel and its tackle, apparel, and furniture for the collection of the fees.

The liabilities and penalties provided for in this Code section are cumulative and are in addition to any rights or remedies available to a pilot or pilots, the commissioners, or to the state under any other law.

History.

Ga. L. 1886, p. 38, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 1656; Civil Code 1910, § 1902; Code 1933, § 80-302; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 10; Ga. L. 1995, p. 846, § 11.

52-6-50.
Fees of pilots aiding vessel in distress.

Any pilot belonging to any port in this state meeting at sea with any vessel in distress, which is bound to another port within this state, shall, if capable and thereunto required, take charge of and pilot such vessel into such port and shall be paid $10.00 a day for every day he may be aboard such vessel at sea, without the bars, and over and above the usual rate of pilotage; and no other pilot shall interfere with him while he is willing to continue his services.

History.

Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 36; Code 1863, § 1470; Code 1868, § 1527; Code 1873, § 1521; Code 1882, § 1521; Civil Code 1895, § 1669; Civil Code 1910, § 1915; Code 1933, § 80-312; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 11.

52-6-51.
Right of pilot boat to one-third of inward and outward pilotage fee.

Any pilot boat which places a pilot on board a vessel for the purpose of conducting it into any of the rivers or harbors mentioned in this chapter shall be entitled to one-third of the inward pilotage fee and any pilot boat which takes a pilot off of a vessel shall be entitled to one-third of the outward pilotage fee.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1468; Code 1868, § 1525; Code 1873, § 1519; Code 1882, § 1519; Civil Code 1895, § 1668; Civil Code 1910, § 1914; Code 1933, § 80-311; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 13.

52-6-52.
Liability for detaining pilots on vessels.

The owner, master, consignee, or charterer of any vessel who carries any pilot against his consent to any foreign or other port shall be liable to such pilot in an action on the case for the payment of his reasonable expenses and $10.00 a day during his necessary absence, provided the carrying away of the pilot is not owing to his own misconduct or negligence; and, if a pilot is detained on board, wind and weather permitting the vessel to go to sea, the owner, master, consignee, or charterer shall be liable to pay the pilot $10.00 a day for every day he is so detained.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1467; Code 1868, § 1524; Code 1873, § 1518; Code 1882, § 1518; Civil Code 1895, § 1667; Civil Code 1910, § 1913; Code 1933, § 80-309; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 14.

52-6-53.
Compulsory retirement of pilots.

Pilots for their respective ports shall be honorably retired at age 65 and no pilot who has been so retired shall thereafter be entitled to act as a licensed pilot, provided that no pilot shall be compulsorily retired at age 65 unless there is in effect a pension system for pilots of the port at which he serves.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 7.

Cross references.

Age discrimination in employment, §

34-1-2

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Pilot and apprentice age limitations, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Board of Pilotage Commissioners, Saint Simons and Saint Andrews Bar, Government of Bar and Harbor Pilotage, Sec. 494-1-1-.08.

Law reviews.

For article, “Age, Time, and Discrimination,” see 53 Ga. L. Rev. 845 (2019).

52-6-54.
Acting as pilot without license; interfering with or disturbing licensed pilot.

Any person who pilots or conducts any vessel underway in the waters of any of the bays, rivers, harbors, or ports of this state or the approaches thereto and who has no authority or license to act as a pilot or has had such authority or license suspended or revoked shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person who interferes with or disturbs a licensed pilot in the performance of his duty shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Code section, any person may assist a vessel in distress which has no pilot on board if such person delivers up the vessel to the first licensed pilot who comes on board and offers to conduct it.

History.

Ga. L. 1886, p. 38, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 1653; Penal Code 1895, §§ 647, 648; Ga. L. 1896, p. 85, § 1; Ga. L. 1901, p. 30, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 1899; Penal Code 1910, §§ 687, 688; Ga. L. 1921, p. 103, § 1; Code 1933, § 80-9901; Ga. L. 1945, p. 279, § 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 846, § 12.